Washington statutes.
RCW 10.43.020

Offense embraces lower degree and included offenses.

When the defendant has been convicted or acquitted upon an indictment or information of an offense consisting of different degrees, the conviction or acquittal shall be a bar to another indictment or information for the offense charged in the former, or for any lower degree of that offense, or for an offense necessarily included therein.

[ 1891 c 28 s 74; Code 1881 s 1096; 1873 p 238 s 257; 1854 p 120 s 121; RRS s 2166.]

NOTES:

Bar as to prosecution for same crime in another degree, or attempt: RCW 10.43.050.